Louisiana, session 2026, HB1096.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 12:407(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§407. Bylaws
* * *
B. Bylaws may be adopted, amended, or repealed by the members. or Unless
otherwise provided in the bylaws, bylaws may be adopted, amended, or repealed by
the board of directors. However, only the members may amend the bylaws when the
amendment concerns the dissolution of the cooperative or the sale, lease, or other
disposition or encumbrance of all or any substantial portion of property belonging
to the cooperative. The board of directors shall not adopt any bylaws in conflict with
the provisions of R.S. 12:414, 418, or 421.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.